Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 21 E-911 Uniform Emergency Telephone System Division

39-21-1.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and disclosed that:

E-911 uniform emergency telephone system is a feasible service and would be beneficial for the citizens of Rhode Island;

E-911 uniform emergency telephone system employs features that contribute to the protection of life and property and add to the operational efficiency of various public safety agencies;

E-911 uniform emergency telephone system affords our residents a more simple and faster means to request assistance in an emergency and, in addition, enables the various agencies to process emergency calls in a more efficient manner than at present;

E-911 uniform emergency telephone system benefits are extremely valuable and this service would be an enhancement to the quality of life throughout our state; and

Changes in consumer habits require that the state E-911 uniform emergency telephone system take the steps necessary to ensure that its operating capabilities are in line with new technologies and practices.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 155, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 516, § 1.

39-21-2.
Establishment of the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division.

There is hereby established within the department of public safety the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division with all powers and authority necessary for acquiring, planning, designing, constructing, extending, improving, operating, maintaining, and updating the uniform emergency telephone system in this state to conform with national standards and support national internetworking of

9-1-1

services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 8; P.L. 2016, ch. 516, § 1.

39-21-3.
Personnel.

The governor shall appoint an associate director of the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division who shall direct the affairs of the division. The division may employ technical experts, and other officers, agents, and attorneys, and fix their qualifications, duties, and compensation. The associate director and the technical experts, officers, agents, and attorneys so employed shall be in the unclassified service of the state. The division may employ other employees, permanent and temporary, and the employees shall be in the unclassified service of the state. The division may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees such administrative duties as it may deem proper.

The department of administration shall furnish the division with suitable offices and telephone service in the state house, state office building, or some other location, for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 8.

39-21-4.
Advisory commission.

There shall be an E-911 uniform emergency telephone system advisory commission consisting of fourteen (14) members to be appointed in the following manner: five (5) members shall be the director of the department of health, or his or her designee, the fire marshal, or his or her designee, the colonel of the Rhode Island state police, or his or her designee, the state telecommunications director, or his or her designee, and the administrator of the division of public utilities and carriers, or his or her designee; three (3) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house: one of whom shall be a member of the house of representatives, and one of whom shall be a representative of the police chiefs’ association, and one of whom shall be a representative of the telecommunication services provider that is the primary provider to the E-911 PSAP; three (3) members shall be appointed by the president of the senate: one of whom shall be a member of the senate, one of whom shall be a representative of the fire chiefs’ association, and one of whom shall be a representative of the wireless telecommunication industry; and three (3) members shall be appointed by the governor: two (2) of whom shall be representatives of the public, and one of whom shall be a representative of the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns.

Members of the commission shall serve five-year (5) terms, except for ex officio members.

The advisory commission may make such recommendations and give such advice to the executive director of the division as it deems appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 1998, ch. 150, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 82.

39-21-5.
Other references to E-911 uniform emergency telephone system — References to “the project” or to “9-1-1 system.”

Wherever in the Rhode Island general laws, chapters 21 and 21.1 of title 39, reference is made to the “E-911 uniform emergency telephone system,” or to “the E-9-1-1 Uniform Emergency Telephone System Authority,” or to “the E-9-1-1 authority,” or to “the division” or to “E-9-1-1” or to “Next Generation

9-1-1

,” or “NG

9-1-1

” or “Text-to-9-1-1,” as an entity, it shall be deemed to mean the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division within the executive department.

Wherever in the Rhode Island general laws, chapters 21 and 21.1 of title 39, reference is made to “the project” or to “911 system,” it shall be deemed to mean the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system and its respective functions and operations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 2002, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 516, § 1.

39-21-6.
Cooperation with federal government.

The division shall have full and complete authority to cooperate with and assist the federal government in all matters relating to the planning, constructing, equipping, maintenance, and operation of the project in the event that the federal government should make any federal funds or federal assistance available therefor.

The division, or any officers or executives designated by it, may act as agent of the federal government in accordance with the requirements of any federal legislation related to federal assistance.

The division is hereby authorized to accept the provisions of any federal legislation, and may file written evidence of each acceptance with the federal government. Each acceptance shall be duly signed by the associate director or such other person or persons as the governor or director of public safety may designate.

The division may enter into all necessary contracts and agreements with the federal or state governments, or any agency thereof, necessary or incident to the project, and all contracts and agreements shall be signed in the name of the division by the associate director or some other person or persons designated by the governor or director of public safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 8.

39-21-7.
Applications for federal and state aid.

Whenever it shall be necessary to obtain assistance from the federal or state government in the form of loans, advances, grants, subsidies, and otherwise, directly or indirectly, for the execution of the project, the division may make all necessary applications for such purposes. All applications shall be made in writing in the name of the division and shall be duly signed by the associate director or other person or persons as the governor or director of public safety may designate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 8.

39-21-8.
Use of federal and state funds.

The division may, for the purpose of carrying out the project or any part thereof authorized by this chapter, accept or use any federal or state funds or assistance, or both, provided thereof under any federal or state law. In the event that federal or state funds or assistance are made available for execution of the project, the project shall be carried out and executed in all respect subject to the provisions of the appropriate federal and state laws providing for the construction and operation of such projects, and the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, and to such terms, conditions, rules, and regulations, not inconsistent with such federal and state law, rules, and regulations, as the division may establish to ensure the proper execution of the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 122.

39-21-9.
Receipt and deposit of federal funds.

All money paid to the division by the federal government for the purpose of executing a project shall be received by the general treasurer and by him or her deposited in the fund, and the division shall forthwith use the money for the payment of debt service on, or the recall or the redemption of, bonds and notes issued by the state in anticipation of federal project payments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5.

39-21-10.
Appropriation of revenues.

With the exception of money received by the division from the sale or licensing of communications and educational materials regarding the use of 911 as a uniform emergency telephone number and system, all money received by the division for the use of the facilities of the project shall be paid over to the general treasurer and by him or her deposited in the fund. All money in the fund is hereby appropriated by the provisions of the chapter to be expended by the division for administration and all expenses relating to the planning, construction, equipping, operation, and maintenance of the project; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or sums as may be necessary from time to time. All money received by the division for the sale or licensing of communications and educational materials as described in this chapter shall be deposited into a separate account or fund by the general treasurer for the sole restricted purpose of financially supporting the creation, distribution, and use of public educational materials regarding the use of 911 as a uniform emergency telephone number and system. For these purposes, the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or sums as may be necessary, from time to time, as determined by the associate director, or his or her designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 122; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 8; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 12.

39-21-11.
Rules and regulations — Review.

The division may adopt rules and regulations, or any amendment to existing rules and regulations, according to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42. The division shall also give notice thereof, prior to the effective date thereof, by sending by registered or certified mail a copy thereof to each person interested therein who shall have registered with the division his or her name and address, with a request to be so notified. Review of the rules may be had as provided in chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5.

39-21-12.
Cost of E-911 service to provider.

The telephone common carrier shall recover the necessary capital and operating costs of providing access for E-911 within the common carrier’s tariff rates for E-911 service. The common carrier is directed to establish and file with the public utilities commission a tariff with rates recovering the capital and operating costs of providing access to the network.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 45, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 65, § 1.

39-21-13.
Division expenses as cost of project.

The expenses of the division in the performance of its duties under this chapter shall be construed to be costs of operation and maintenance of the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 122.

39-21-14.
Cooperation and coordination with other agencies.

In the performance of its duties under this chapter, the division shall be entitled to ask for and to receive from any public or private agency and any other commission, board, officer, agency, or municipal subdivision of the state such information, cooperation, assistance, and advice as shall be reasonable and proper in view of the nature of its functions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 122; P.L. 2002, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 261, § 1.

39-21-15.
Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed liberally in order to accomplish the purposes hereof, and where any specific power is given to the division by the provisions hereof, the statement shall not be deemed to exclude or impair any power otherwise in this chapter conferred upon the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5.

39-21-16.
State agencies — Toll-free telephone line.

The state shall provide, for the use of the general public, a toll-free watts telephone line and number for each public agency that utilizes the 277 exchange.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 36, § 5.

39-21-17.
Next generation 911.

The E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division shall take all steps necessary to implement “Next Generation-9-1-1,” “NG

9-1-1

,” or “Text-to-9-1-1” technologies as soon as practicable, and report back to the general assembly no later than March 30, 2017, a timeline that anticipates the date of completion.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 516, § 2.